Utah statutes.
9-4-1701.   Creation and administration.

(1)  There is created a restricted special revenue fund known as the "Intermountain Weatherization Training Fund."

(2)  The Intermountain Weatherization Training Fund shall consist of:

(a)  private contributions;

(b)  donations or grants from public or private entities;

(c)  fees;

(d)  any money appropriated by the Legislature; and

(e)  interest and earnings on fund money.

(3)  The division shall authorize the expenditure of fund money to the Weatherization Training Center for the administration, operation, maintenance, and support of the center subject to:

(a)  money available in the fund; and

(b)  rules established under Subsection (5).

(4)  Administrative costs of the Intermountain Weatherization Fund shall be paid from the fund.

(5)  The division shall:

(a)  administer the money deposited in the Intermountain Weatherization Training Fund;

(b)  distribute the money in the Intermountain Weatherization Training Fund in accordance with Subsection (5)(c); and

(c)  make rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, establishing:

(i)  the procedures for awarding fund money; and

(ii)  the procedure for the Weatherization Training Center to apply for money from the Intermountain Weatherization Training Fund.

